Ohio, session 136, HB91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3333.802 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 3333.802. (A) The traumatic brain injury treatment 7
accelerator program is created in the department of higher 8
education. The aim of the program is to advance scientific 9
research about, and to develop treatments for, traumatic brain 10
injuries and to promote this state as a biohub for traumatic 11
brain injury research. 12
(B) The brain injury research foundation shall administer 13
the program on behalf of the department and shall conduct the 14
program as a public-private partnership. 15
(1) As part of its duties, the foundation shall coordinate 16
and award grants to entities, including universities, to support 17

H. B. No. 91 Page 2
As Introduced
traumatic brain injury research. To be eligible for an award 18
under the program, each entity partner shall demonstrate to the 19
foundation that it will match the foundation's award with an 20
equal amount awarded to it from one or more other sources, which 21
may include institutions, private foundations, or the federal 22
government. Each entity partner awarded a grant under this 23
section shall conduct the funded project only in this state. 24
(2) On an annual basis, the foundation shall prepare a 25
report detailing the program's progress and shall submit copies 26
of the report to all of the following individuals: the governor; 27
the directors of the departments of aging, developmental 28
disabilities, education and workforce, health, mental health and 29
addiction services, public safety, and veterans services; the 30
chancellor of higher education; the medicaid director; the 31
administrator of workers' compensation; the members of the brain 32
injury advisory committee; and the chief medical officer of each 33
medical center operated by the U.S. department of veterans 34
affairs in this state. The foundation also shall submit copies 35
to the general assembly in accordance with section 101.68 of the 36
Revised Code. 37
(3) The foundation shall annually commission a certified 38
public accounting firm to conduct an independent audit of the 39
program. The results of the audit shall be provided to the 40
auditor of state. 41
(4) The foundation shall regularly report to the director 42
of the traumatic brain injury treatment accelerator program 43
oversight review board about the progress of funded projects, 44
including outcomes achieved and any challenges encountered. 45
(5) The foundation shall provide the traumatic brain 46
injury treatment accelerator program oversight review board 47

H. B. No. 91 Page 3
As Introduced
access to its grants management software system as described in 48
division (C)(1)(b) of this section. 49
(C) The chancellor of higher education shall attempt to 50
avoid redundant traumatic brain injury research, shall ensure 51
transparency and accountability in the use of program funds, and 52
shall take appropriate measures to address any instances of 53
fraud, waste, or abuse. As part of those duties, the chancellor 54
shall establish the traumatic brain injury treatment accelerator 55
program oversight review board to provide guidance to the 56
foundation and to oversee the program's implementation and its 57
responsible allocation of funds. 58
(1) The review board shall be charged with the following 59
duties: 60
(a) Overseeing the foundation's operations; 61
(b) Tracking the alignment, milestones, and progress of 62
research projects in the foundation's grants management software 63
system; 64
(c) Ensuring that the foundation's process for awarding 65
grants is fair and transparent and complies with relevant 66
regulations; 67
(d) Performing an internal audit to ensure that the 68
program uses its resources in an economical, efficient, and 69
effective manner. 70
(2) The review board shall consist of not less than five 71
and not more than thirteen members, each appointed by the 72
chancellor. In making appointments, the chancellor shall 73
consider an individual's experience and shall ensure that the 74
review board includes all of the following as members: 75

H. B. No. 91 Page 4
As Introduced
(a) At least one individual affiliated with a university 76
that enrolls fewer than five thousand students; 77
(b) At least one individual affiliated with a university 78
that enrolls between five thousand and ten thousand students; 79
(c) At least one individual affiliated with a university 80
that enrolls between ten thousand and twenty thousand students; 81
(d) At least one individual affiliated with a university 82
that enrolls more than twenty thousand students; 83
(e) At least one stakeholder advocate. 84
The chancellor also shall attempt to ensure that any 85
remaining appointments consist of individuals who are either 86
educators or health care providers within the traumatic brain 87
injury field. 88
Of the initial appointments, half of the members shall 89
serve terms of two years and the remaining half shall serve 90
terms of three years. Thereafter, each membership term shall be 91
for two years. Members may be reappointed, and vacancies shall 92
be filled in the manner provided for original appointments. Any 93
member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the 94
expiration date of the term for which the member's predecessor 95
was appointed shall hold office as a member for the remainder of 96
that term. 97
Members shall not be compensated for serving on the review 98
board, but shall be reimbursed for ordinary travel expenses, 99
including meals and lodging incurred in the performance of their 100
duties. 101
The review board shall elect, by a majority vote, a 102
director to preside at all meetings and to coordinate the 103

H. B. No. 91 Page 5
As Introduced
functions and activities of the board. The director shall serve 104
as the review board's primary contact with the foundation. 105
A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum. 106
The review board shall meet at least three times per year, but 107
may meet at other times, as deemed necessary, subject to the 108
call of the director or by request of a majority of its members. 109
The board shall provide on a periodic basis 110
recommendations to the foundation regarding the program's 111
assessed strengths and weaknesses. 112
The board may establish any organizational structure it 113
determines necessary to accomplish its functions and duties. The 114
board shall be attached to the department of higher education 115
for administrative purposes. 116
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 117
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 118
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 119
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 120
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 121
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 122
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 123
Section 3. 124
125
1 2 3 4 5
A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 2354A1 TBI Treatment Accelerator $5,000,000 $5,000,000
Program

H. B. No. 91 Page 6
As Introduced
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $5,000,000 $5,000,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $5,000,000 $5,000,000
TBI TREATMENT ACCELERATOR PROGRAM 126
The foregoing appropriation item 2354A1, TBI Treatment 127
Accelerator Program, shall be used by the Chancellor of Higher 128
Education for the Traumatic Brain Injury Treatment Accelerator 129
Program pursuant to section 3333.802 of the Revised Code. 130
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 131
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 132
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 133
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 134
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 135
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 136
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 137
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 138
of the 136th General Assembly. 139